test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-sjarys_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - ся̄рысь: # Noun 122 'eng ear/fin korva' - full paradigm
     ся̄рысь+N+Sg+Nom: ся̄рысь
     ся̄рысь+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: ся̄рысюм
     ся̄рысь+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: ся̄рысин
     ся̄рысь+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: ся̄рысе
     ся̄рысь+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: ся̄рысьме̄н
     ся̄рысь+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: ся̄рысӣн
     ся̄рысь+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: ся̄рысе̄н
     ся̄рысь+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: ся̄рысюв
     ся̄рысь+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: ся̄рысӣн
     ся̄рысь+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: ся̄рысяныл
     
     ся̄рысь+N+Sg+Loc: ся̄рысьт
     ся̄рысь+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: ся̄рысюмт
     ся̄рысь+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: ся̄рысинт
     ся̄рысь+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: ся̄рысет
     ся̄рысь+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: ся̄рысьме̄нт
     ся̄рысь+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: ся̄рысӣнт
     ся̄рысь+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: ся̄рысе̄нт
     ся̄рысь+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: ся̄рысювт
     ся̄рысь+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: ся̄рысӣнт
     ся̄рысь+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: ся̄рысянылт
     
     ся̄рысь+N+Sg+All: ся̄рысьн
     ся̄рысь+N+Sg+Abl: ся̄рысьныл
     ся̄рысь+N+Sg+Ins: ся̄рсил
     ся̄рысь+N+Sg+Tra: ся̄рысиг
     
     ся̄рысь+N+Du+Nom: ся̄рысиг
     ся̄рысь+N+Pl+Nom: ся̄рысит
